Utah statutes.
10-8-71.   Waterworks -- Police and fire signals -- Retainage.
(1)  They may purchase, construct, lease, rent, manage and maintain any system
or part of any system of waterworks, hydrants and supplies of water,
telegraphic or other police or fire signals, and pass all ordinances, penal or
otherwise, that shall be necessary for the full protection, maintenance,
management and control of the property so leased, purchased or constructed.
(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private person, firm, or corporation
to construct all or part of any waterworks system is retained or withheld, it
shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.
